Mississippi statutes. Title 39. Libraries, Arts, Archives and History
Chapter 33. Mississippi Country Music Trail

§ 39-33-1.
Division of Tourism of Mississippi Development Authority authorized to create statewide Mississippi Country Music Trail infrastructure; purpose; trail markers; coordination with other organizations to share resources and information; coordination of marketing plan with state historic preservation programs.

The Division of Tourism of the Mississippi Development Authority is authorized and directed to do the following:

To make an inventory of country music “assets” that make up the country music culture that could be developed into a program for domestic and international tourism, and opportunities for investment.

To establish a statewide Mississippi “Country Music Trail” infrastructure to offer to tourists and target groups a structured tour of Mississippi country music historical sites and performance venues.

To designate specific sites for the erection of appropriate “Mississippi Country Music Trail” markers to offer to tourists and targeted groups a structured tour of Mississippi country music historical sites and performance venues. The division shall be authorized to purchase appropriate Mississippi Country Music Trail markers from any of its available funds. The texts for the Mississippi Country Music Trail markers shall be approved by the division. The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall cooperate with the division by erecting and maintaining the markers that have been approved by the division.

To coordinate the Mississippi Country Music Trail program with the Mississippi Department of Archives and History, the Mississippi Department of Transportation, the Mississippi Educational Television Authority, the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, the Jimmie Rogers Museum, the Center for the Study of Southern Culture at the University of Mississippi, the Delta Center for Culture and Learning at Delta State University, the Mississippi Arts Commission and similar organizations to share resources and information in order to ensure a comprehensive approach to marketing the country music and country music culture in Mississippi.

To coordinate the Mississippi Country Music Trail marketing plan with any existing state historic preservation program, in order to identify and preserve country music historic properties, and determine the eligibility of such properties for listing on the National Register of Historic Places, and prepare nominations of such sites.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 424, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.